Utah statutes.
16-16-1611.   Consolidation.

(1)  Constituent entities that are limited cooperative associations or foreign cooperatives may agree to call a merger a consolidation under this part.

(2)  All provisions governing mergers or using the term merger in this chapter apply equally to mergers that the constituent entities choose to call consolidations under Subsection (1).



Enacted by Chapter 363, 2008 General Session

